Georgia statutes. TITLE 29 Guardian and Ward
CHAPTER 8 County Guardians

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 16, not codified by the General Assembly, provides, in part, that: “all appointments of guardians of the person or property made pursuant to former Title 29 shall continue in effect and shall thereafter be governed by the provisions of this Act.”

29-8-1.
County administrators as ex officio county guardians.

County administrators as provided for in Article 5 of Chapter 6 of Title 53 are ex officio county guardians and shall serve as guardians or conservators in all cases where appointed by the court.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-8-1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1; Ga. L. 2011, p. 752, § 29/HB 142.

29-8-2.
Bond requirements.

In addition to the bond required in Code Section 53-6-41, county guardians shall give another bond with good security, to be judged by the court, in the sum of $5,000.00. The bond shall be payable to the court for the benefit of all concerned. It shall be attested by the judge or clerk of the court and shall be conditioned upon the faithful discharge of the county guardian’s duty as such, as required by law. Actions on the bond may be brought by any person aggrieved by the misconduct of the county guardian, as provided by law for actions on the bonds of other guardians.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-8-2

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1; Ga. L. 2011, p. 752, § 29/HB 142.

29-8-3.
Letters of guardianship or conservatorship; liability and rights of county guardian.

The court shall grant to the county guardian separate letters of guardianship or conservatorship upon each appointment. The county guardian shall be subject to all liabilities and entitled to all the rights and emoluments provided for other guardians or conservators and shall be governed by the law provided for other guardians or conservators.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-8-3

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.

29-8-4.
Additional security on bond.

If in the opinion of the court it shall become necessary for the good of any conservatorship placed or about to be placed in the hands of the county guardian for the county guardian to give additional security on the bond or to give additional bond with security, the court shall have the authority to fix the amount of the bond and shall cite the county guardian to appear and show cause, if any, why the additional bond or additional security should not be given.

If upon the hearing the county guardian fails to show good cause why the additional bond or additional security should not be given, the court shall issue an order fixing the amount of the bond and direct the county guardian to give additional security on or before a certain date, which date shall be within 30 days of the date of the order.

Should the county guardian fail, refuse, or neglect to give additional bond or additional security on or before the date fixed in the order of the court and fail to show good cause why further time should be allowed, it shall be the duty of the court to remove the county guardian and to appoint another county guardian for the unexpired term of office. The order of removal shall be recorded as provided for the order of appointment.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-8-4

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.

29-8-5.
Revocation of letters of guardianship or conservatorship or other court orders necessary for good of ward.

The court may, for good cause shown, as provided in Code Section 29-5-92, revoke the letters of guardianship or conservatorship of the county guardian, require additional security on the county guardian’s bond, or issue any other order as is expedient and necessary for the good of any particular conservatorship in the hands of the county guardian.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-8-5

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1; Ga. L. 2006, p. 805, § 19/SB 534.